Massachusetts, session 194th, H4153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The following shall be the charter for the city of Somerville: 
2  PREAMBLE 
3  We, the people of Somerville, with our diversity in culture and thought, in order to 
4 reaffirm the liberties of the people with respect to the conduct of our local government, adopt 
5 this charter to continue and enhance the city’s strong traditions of the pursuit of justice; 
6 empowerment of residents; ethical, transparent and responsive leadership; wise use of public 
7 resources; representation for all; and an engaged populace. We expect that our government will 
8 be approachable, accountable, equitable, inclusive, and respectful towards all people, and it will 
9 strive to provide all residents an equal opportunity to participate fully in the economic, cultural 
10 and intellectual life of the city. 
11  ARTICLE 1 

2 of 50 12  INCORPORATION; SHORT TITLE; DEFINITIONS 
13  SECTION 1-1: INCORPORATION 
14  The residents of the City of Somerville within the territorial limits established by law, 
15 shall continue to be a municipal corporation, a body corporate and politic, under the name "City 
16 of Somerville.” 
17  SECTION 1-2: SHORT TITLE 
18  This instrument shall be known and may be cited as the City of Somerville Charter 
19 (“charter”). 
20    
21  SECTION 1-3: SEPARATION OF POWERS 
22  The administration of the fiscal, prudential and municipal affairs of the city shall be 
23 vested in an executive branch led by a mayor and a legislative branch consisting of a city 
24 council. The legislative branch shall never exercise any executive power and the executive 
25 branch shall never exercise any legislative power. 
26  SECTION 1-4: POWERS OF THE CITY 
27  Subject only to express limitations on the exercise of any power or function by a 
28 municipal government in the constitution or General Laws, it is the intention and the purpose of 
29 the voters of the city, through the adoption of this charter, to secure for themselves and their 
30 government all of the powers it is possible to secure as fully and as completely as though each 
31 power were specifically and individually enumerated in this charter. 

3 of 50 32  SECTION 1-5: CONSTRUCTION 
33  The powers of the city under this charter are to be construed liberally in favor of the city 
34 and the specific mention of any particular power is not intended to limit the general powers of 
35 the city as stated in section 1-4. To the extent that any provision of this charter shall conflict with 
36 any special act or law adopted by the city to the contrary, the provisions of this charter shall 
37 prevail. 
38  SECTION 1-6: INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS 
39  Subject only to express limitations in the constitution or General Laws, the city may 
40 exercise any of its powers or perform any of its functions and may participate in the financing 
41 thereof, jointly or in cooperation, by contract or otherwise, with the commonwealth or any of its 
42 agencies or political subdivisions, or with the United States government or any of its agencies. 
43  SECTION 1-7: DEFINITIONS 
44  Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the 
45 following meanings as used in this charter: 
46  (1) “Business day”, any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. For the 
47 purposes of this definition, legal holiday shall mean Massachusetts legal holidays as published 
48 by the secretary of the commonwealth. 
49  (2) “Charter”, this charter and any adopted amendments to it. 
50  (3) “City”, the City of Somerville. 
51  (4) “City agency”, any multiple member body, department, division or office of the city. 

4 of 50 52  (5) “City officer” or “department head”, a person having charge of a city office or 
53 department. 
54  (6) “City website”, an online site established and maintained by the city as its repository 
55 of municipal information. 
56  (7) “Emergency”, a sudden, generally unexpected occurrence or set of circumstances 
57 demanding immediate action or response. 
58  (8) “General Laws”, the Massachusetts General Laws. 
59  (9) “Majority vote”, a majority of the present and voting members of a   body, unless 
60 otherwise provided for by law or by the body’s own rules. Provided, however, that General Laws 
61 related to any vote to meet in executive session shall always require a majority of the full 
62 multiple member body. 
63  (10) “Measure”, any ordinance, order, other vote or proceeding adopted, or proposed to 
64 be adopted, by the city council or the school committee. 
65  (11) “Multiple member body”, any council, commission, committee, subcommittee or 
66 other body consisting of 2 or more persons, whether elected, appointed or otherwise constituted, 
67 but not including the city council or its committees, the school committee or its subcommittees 
68 or an advisory committee or task force established by the mayor or city council. 
69  (i) “Quasi-judicial body”, any multiple member body which resolves specific disputes, or 
70 makes determinations about the rights, obligations or privileges of identifiable parties. 
71  (ii) “Regulatory body”, any multiple member body responsible for establishing or 
72 enforcing rules or regulations. 

5 of 50 73  (12) “Municipal voter”, anyone who is eligible to vote in a municipal election pursuant to 
74 this charter. 
75  (13) “Organization or reorganization plan”, a plan submitted by the mayor to the city 
76 council which proposes: 
77  (i) a change in the organization or the administrative structure of the city administration 
78 or organization; or  
79  (ii) a change in the way in which municipal services are delivered. 
80  (14) “Post”, make available publicly on the city website, at city hall, in a local newspaper 
81 or as otherwise may be required by law. For the purposes of this definition, a local newspaper 
82 shall be a newspaper of general circulation within the city, with either weekly or daily 
83 circulation. The city council president may, from time to time, select a local newspaper for 
84 posting according to a procedure that shall be set forth in the rules of the city council. 
85  (15) “Quorum”, a majority of all voting members of a multiple member body unless 
86 some other number is established by law or by ordinance. 
87  (16) “Statewide voter”, anyone who is eligible to vote pursuant to state and federal law. 
88  (17) “Year”, a calendar year, unless otherwise specified. 
89  ARTICLE 2 
90  LEGISLATIVE BRANCH 
91  SECTION 2-1: COMPOSITION; TERM OF OFFICE; ELIGIBILITY 

6 of 50 92  (a) Composition - There shall be a city council consisting of 11 members which shall 
93 exercise the legislative powers of the city. Four of these members, to be known as councilors at-
94 large, shall be nominated and elected by the municipal voters at large. Seven of these members, 
95 to be known as ward councilors, shall be nominated from and elected by the municipal voters in 
96 each ward, with 1 ward councilor to be elected from each of the 7 wards into which the city is 
97 divided under section 7-7. 
98  (b) Term of Office - The term of office for councilors shall be 2 years each, beginning on 
99 the first business day in January following the municipal election. 
100  (c) Eligibility - Any statewide voter residing in the city shall be eligible to hold the office 
101 of councilor at-large. Any statewide voter residing in the ward from which election is sought 
102 shall be eligible to hold the office of ward councilor. If the city council determines that a ward 
103 councilor or a councilor at-large has removed from the city during the councilor’s term, that 
104 office shall immediately be deemed vacant and filled in the manner provided in section 2-12. A 
105 ward councilor who removes from the ward in which the councilor was elected and who remains 
106 a municipal voter of the city may continue to serve the balance of the term to which elected. 
107  SECTION 2-2: PROHIBITIONS 
108  (a) Holding Other City Position – Except as otherwise provided by this charter, a member 
109 of the city council shall hold no other compensated city position. A former member of the city 
110 council shall not hold any compensated appointed city position for 1 year after termination of 
111 their service on the city council, unless the city council approves a waiver of this provision by 
112 affirmative vote of 8 members of the city council. This section shall not prevent a city employee 

7 of 50 113 who vacated a position to serve as a member of the city council from returning to the same 
114 position upon the expiration of the term for which that person was elected. 
115  (b) Interference with Administration - The city council or any member of the city council 
116 shall not give orders or directions to any employee of the city appointed by the mayor, either 
117 publicly or privately. 
118  SECTION 2-3: COMPENSATION 
119  The members of the city council shall receive compensation for their services as set by 
120 ordinance. An ordinance increasing or reducing the compensation of the members of the city 
121 council shall not be effective unless: 
122  (1) it is adopted by affirmative vote of 8 members of the city council; 
123  (2) it is adopted prior to the last 6 months of the city council’s term; and 
124  (3) it provides that the compensation increase or reduction is to take effect upon the 
125 organization of the city government following the next regular municipal election. 
126  SECTION 2-4: GENERAL POWERS 
127  Except as otherwise provided by the General Laws or by this charter, all powers of the 
128 city shall be vested in the city council which shall provide for the performance of all duties and 
129 obligations imposed upon the city by law. 
130  SECTION 2-5: EXERCISE OF POWERS; QUORUM; RULES 

8 of 50 131  (a) Exercise of Powers - Except as otherwise provided by General Laws or by this 
132 charter, the legislative powers of the city council may be exercised in a manner determined by 
133 the city council. 
134  (b) Quorum - Once a quorum is present, a majority vote shall be required to adopt any 
135 ordinance, except as otherwise provided by General Laws or by this charter. 
136  (c) Rules of Procedure - The city council shall adopt rules regulating the procedures of 
137 the city council, which shall be subject to adoption, amendment or repeal by vote of the city 
138 council.  
139  (d) Meetings - Regular meetings of the city council shall be held at a time and place fixed 
140 by ordinance. 
141  (e) Special meetings of the city council shall be held at the call of the president or at the 
142 call of any 6 or more members, for any purpose. Except in an emergency as declared by the city 
143 council president, notice of the meeting shall be delivered to the city clerk at least 3 business 
144 days in advance of the time set and shall specify the date, time, location and purpose for which 
145 the meeting is to be held. The city clerk shall post an agenda for such meeting at least 2 business 
146 days in advance of the time set.   
147  (f) All sessions of the city council and every city council committee or subcommittee 
148 shall, at all times, be open to the public, unless otherwise specified by law. 
149  (g) A full, accurate, up-to-date account of the proceedings of the city council shall be 
150 maintained by the city clerk, which shall include a record of each vote taken and be made 
151 available with reasonable promptness following each meeting. Executive session minutes shall 

9 of 50 152 be made available as soon as publication of the minutes would not defeat the purpose of the 
153 executive session, unless otherwise provided by law. 
154    
155  SECTION 2-6: ELECTION, TERM, AND POWERS OF CITY COUNCIL PRESIDENT 
156 AND VICE-PRESIDENT 
157  (a) Election and Term - As soon as practicable after the councilors-elect have been 
158 qualified following each regular municipal election, as provided in section 7-4, the city council 
159 shall elect from among its members a president and vice-president who shall serve for 1-year 
160 terms. The member of the council with the most years of service shall preside at the election. If 2 
161 or more members have the same term of service the councilor with the last name that is first in 
162 alphabetical order from among such councilors shall preside. The conduct of all elections of the 
163 city council president and vice-president shall otherwise be prescribed within the rules of the city 
164 council. 
165  (b) Powers and Duties - The president shall have the following powers and duties: 
166  (1) determine the agenda for city council meetings; 
167  (2) preside at all meetings of the city council, regulate its proceedings, and decide all 
168 questions of order, provided, however, that the vice-president shall preside in the absence of the 
169 president; 
170  (3) appoint all members of committees of the city council, whether special or standing; 
171  (4) have the same powers to vote upon measures coming before the city council as any 
172 other member of the city council; and 

10 of 50 173  (5) perform any other duties consistent with the office that are established by this charter, 
174 ordinance or other vote of the city council. 
175  SECTION 2-7: APPOINTMENTS OF THE CITY COUNCIL 
176  (a) City Clerk - The city council shall appoint a city clerk to serve at the pleasure of the 
177 city council and until a qualified successor is chosen. The city clerk shall have the powers and 
178 duties relating to the keeping of records and vital statistics, the issuance of licenses as are 
179 provided to city clerks by the General Laws and such additional powers and duties as may be 
180 provided by law or by other vote of the city council. 
181  (b) Advisory Legal Counsel - Subject to appropriation, the city council may secure legal 
182 services, when needed, to seek a secondary legal opinion. The city council shall make a 
183 reasonable request for legal services, and that request shall not be unreasonably denied by the 
184 mayor. The city solicitor and any advisory legal counsel shall consult to the extent practicable 
185 prior to the release of any secondary opinion. The legal services provided to the council shall not 
186 include representation of the council or any councilor in any litigation, or the issuance of formal 
187 legal opinions on behalf of the city. The city solicitor shall remain the only authorized officer of 
188 the city in all legal matters involving the city’s government. 
189  (c) Other Staff - Subject to appropriation, the city council may employ staff as it deems 
190 necessary. 
191  (d) Removals and Suspensions of City Council Staff - City council appointments may be 
192 removed at the sole discretion of the city council subject to limitations and requirements imposed 
193 by federal and state laws, rules or regulations.  

11 of 50 194  SECTION 2-8: CITY COUNCIL CONFIRMATION OF CERTAIN APPOINTMENTS 
195  (a) Department Heads - The mayor shall refer to the city council for confirmation and 
196 simultaneously file with the city clerk the name of each person the mayor appoints as a 
197 department head. These appointments shall be considered confirmed 30 days from the date of the 
198 first regularly scheduled city council meeting after the date on which notice of the appointment 
199 was filed with the city clerk, unless the city council within said 30 days shall reject the 
200 appointment by the affirmative vote of 8 members. However, if no city council meeting is held 
201 within the subsequent 30 days of the first meeting, the city council shall instead have 30 days 
202 from the second regularly scheduled meeting after the appointment to reject the appointment. 
203 The city council shall not unreasonably reject an appointment and shall accompany a rejection 
204 with a written statement describing the reason, which shall be delivered to the mayor and placed 
205 on file with the city clerk within 30 days of the city council’s vote rejecting an appointment. The 
206 question on rejection of any appointment made by the mayor shall not be subject to the 
207 procedure of charter objection provided in section 2-9(b) of this charter. 
208  (b) Multiple Member Bodies - The mayor shall refer to the city council and 
209 simultaneously file with the city clerk the name of each person the mayor desires to appoint as a 
210 member of a multiple member body. The city council shall have 60 days after the date on which 
211 notice of the proposed appointment was filed with the city clerk to vote to approve or reject the 
212 appointment, with approval not to be unreasonably withheld. If the city council does not take 
213 action on the appointment within 60 days the appointment shall be deemed approved. Multiple 
214 member body members may be removed at the discretion of their appointing authority. 

12 of 50 215  (1) All appointments to quasi-judicial bodies and regulatory bodies shall be for terms 
216 established by administrative order or the General Laws. Any member of a quasi-judicial body or 
217 regulatory body appointed to a successive term shall be subject to confirmation by the city 
218 council under section 2-8(b) upon the expiration of each term. 
219  (2) In the event of a vacancy on a multiple member body where the seat has remained 
220 vacant in excess of 1 year and the mayor has not referred to the city council any proposed 
221 appointees to fill the vacancy, the city council president may present to the mayor the names of 
222 up to 3 persons as recommendations for appointment. The procedure for selecting names of 
223 persons for presentation to the mayor shall be established within the rules of the city council. 
224  (3) The mayor shall twice annually, in February and August, post a complete list of the 
225 vacancies on all multiple member bodies, as well as the procedures for individuals to apply to 
226 become a member of such bodies. This posting shall be in addition to, and not a substitute for, 
227 regular posting for the purpose of filling vacancies as they arise. 
228  (c) Police and Fire Employees - The mayor shall refer to the city council and 
229 simultaneously file with the city clerk the name of each person the mayor desires to appoint or 
230 promote as a member or officer of the police department or the fire department. The city council 
231 shall not unreasonably withhold confirmation of appointments, shall adhere to any merit 
232 principles identified in applicable law, including, but not limited to applicable civil service law, 
233 and shall accompany a rejection with a written statement describing the reason, which shall be 
234 delivered to and placed on file with the city clerk within 30 days of that rejection. The question 
235 on confirmation of any appointment submitted by the mayor shall not be subject to the procedure 
236 of charter objection provided in section 2-9(b) of this charter.  

13 of 50 237  SECTION 2-9: ORDINANCES AND OTHER MEASURES 
238  (a) Measures - Every adopted measure shall become effective at the expiration of 10 days 
239 after adoption or upon the signature of the mayor, whichever occurs first, unless the ordinance or 
240 this charter provides otherwise. An ordinance shall not be amended or repealed except by 
241 another ordinance adopted in accordance with this charter. 
242  (b) Charter Objection - On the first occasion that the question on adoption of a measure is 
243 put to the city council, a single member may object to the taking of the vote and postpone the 
244 vote until the next meeting of the city council, whether regular or special. If 2 or more members 
245 object, the vote shall be postponed until the next regular meeting. This procedure shall not be 
246 used more than once for any specific matter regardless of whether it has been amended. A 
247 charter objection shall have privilege over all motions provided, however, that it shall be raised 
248 prior to or at the call for a vote by the presiding officer and all debate shall cease. 
249  SECTION 2-10: ACCESS TO INFORMATION 
250  (a) In General - The city council may make investigations into the affairs of the city and 
251 into the conduct and performance of any city agency. Absent compelling circumstances or an 
252 emergency which shall be declared on record and noted in the city council minutes, the city 
253 council shall give a minimum of 14 days’ notice to any person it may require to appear before it 
254 under this section. In the case of compelling circumstances or emergency, 7 days’ notice shall be 
255 allowed. The notice shall include specific questions on which the city council seeks information 
256 and any person called to appear before the city council under this section shall not be required to 
257 respond to any question not relevant or related to those questions presented in advance and in 
258 writing. The mayor shall receive a copy of any notice issued under this section at the same time 

14 of 50 259 as the person who is requested to appear before the council. A majority vote of the city council 
260 shall be required to issue notice under this section. 
261  (b) Department Head - The city council may require, by majority vote, specific 
262 information from a department head or their designee on any matter related to the municipal 
263 services, functions and powers or duties which are within the scope of responsibility of such 
264 department head and related to the official duties and responsibilities of the city council. The 
265 department head or their designee shall not be required to answer questions relating to any other 
266 matter outside the scope of the matter noticed or provide information the release of which is 
267 prohibited by law. 
268  (c) Mayor - The city council may request, by majority vote, specific information from the 
269 mayor on any municipal matter related to the official duties and responsibilities of the city 
270 council. The mayor or their designee shall appear before the city council and respond to the 
271 questions. The mayor or their designee shall not be required to answer questions relating to any 
272 other matter outside the scope of the matter noticed or be required to provide information the 
273 release of which is prohibited by law. The mayor may bring to this meeting any assistant, 
274 department head or other city officer or employee that the mayor may consider necessary to 
275 assist in responding to the questions posed by the city council. 
276  SECTION 2-11: GROUP PETITIONS 
277  The city council shall hold a public hearing and act with respect to every petition which is 
278 addressed to it and which is signed by at least 50 municipal voters as certified by the board of 
279 election commissioners. The hearing shall be held by the city council or by a committee or 
280 subcommittee thereof, and the city council shall act on the petition within 3 months of filing with 

15 of 50 281 the city clerk. Hearings on 2 or more petitions filed under this section may be held at the same 
282 time and place. At least 14 days before the hearing, the city clerk shall notify the 10 petitioners 
283 whose names first appear on each petition, publish a general summary of the subject matter of 
284 the petition, and post notice of the date and time of the public hearing. A hearing shall not be 
285 held upon any subject more than once in a 12-month period, as determined by the city council 
286 president.  
287  SECTION 2-12: FILLING OF VACANCIES 
288  (a) Councilor At-Large - When a vacancy exists for an at-large city council seat and more 
289 than 180 days remain in the term, the city clerk shall notify the city council and the chairperson 
290 of the board of election commissioners of the vacancy within 7 days. Within 7 days after 
291 notification, the chairperson of the board of election commissioners or a designee shall certify, in 
292 writing, to the city clerk that the defeated candidate for the office of councilor at-large with the 
293 next highest number of votes at the prior municipal election, if willing and able to serve, shall fill 
294 the remainder of the existing term. The city clerk shall administer the oath of office to the person 
295 within 15 days after certification and the person shall take the seat. If the person who is eligible 
296 declines the office, is not eligible and willing to serve, or fails to take the oath of office within 
297 the time period set forth in this section, then the person with the next highest number of votes for 
298 councilor at large at the prior municipal election who is eligible and willing to serve shall take 
299 the seat under the same circumstances as above. If no such candidate for the office can serve, the 
300 city council shall call a special election to fill the seat for the remainder of the term. If the 
301 vacancy occurs with 180 days or fewer in the existing term, the vacancy shall be filled as above; 
302 provided, however, if no candidate is available to take the seat, the seat shall remain vacant until 
303 the next regular municipal election, and the person elected shall take office upon certification of 

16 of 50 304 the vote, and serve for the remainder of the existing term as well as the term to which elected. 
305 The city clerk shall administer the oath of office to them at the next meeting of the city council. 
306  (b) Ward Councilor - If a vacancy occurs in the office of ward councilor and more than 
307 180 days remain on the existing term, the city council shall immediately order a special election 
308 to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. If a vacancy occurs 180 or fewer days 
309 before the end of the term, the seat shall remain vacant until the next regular municipal election 
310 for the office and the person elected shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired 
311 term and the term to which elected. The city clerk shall administer the oath of office to the 
312 person at the next meeting of the city council. 
313  ARTICLE 3 
314  EXECUTIVE BRANCH 
315  SECTION 3-1: MAYOR: ROLE; TERM OF OFFICE; ELIGIBILITY 
316  (a) Role - The chief executive officer of the city shall be a mayor, elected by the 
317 municipal voters of the city at large. The role of mayor shall be a full-time position. 
318  (b) Term of Office - The term of office for mayor shall be 2 years, beginning on the first 
319 business day in January following the municipal election. 
320  (c) Eligibility - Any statewide voter residing in Somerville shall be eligible to hold the 
321 office of mayor. 
322  SECTION 3-2: PROHIBITIONS 

17 of 50 323  The mayor shall not hold another compensated city position or other elected public 
324 office. A former mayor shall not hold a compensated appointed city office or city employment 
325 for 1 year after termination of their service as the mayor. Any former mayor shall not receive 
326 compensation for contracted work authorized during their tenure as the mayor. This subsection 
327 shall not prevent a city officer or other city employee who has vacated a position to serve as the 
328 mayor from returning to the same office or other position of city employment held when the 
329 position was vacated. This prohibition shall not apply to persons covered by a leave of absence 
330 under section 37 of chapter 31 of the General Laws. 
331  SECTION 3-3: COMPENSATION 
332  The mayor shall receive compensation for their services as set by the city council by 
333 ordinance. An ordinance increasing or reducing the compensation of the mayor shall not be 
334 effective unless: 
335  (1) it is adopted by affirmative vote of 8 members of the city council; 
336  (2) it is adopted prior to the last 6 months of the mayor’s term; and 
337  (3) it provides that the compensation increase or reduction is to take effect upon the 
338 organization of the city government following the next regular municipal election. 
339  SECTION 3-4: EXECUTIVE POWERS 
340  (a) Executive Powers - The executive powers of the city shall be vested solely in the 
341 mayor and may be exercised by the mayor either personally or through the city agencies under 
342 the general supervision and control of the office of the mayor. The mayor shall cause this charter, 
343 laws, ordinances and other orders of the city government to be enforced and shall cause a record 

18 of 50 344 of all official acts of the executive branch of the city government to be kept. The mayor shall 
345 supervise, direct, and be responsible for the efficient administration of all city activities and 
346 functions placed under the control of the mayor by law or by this charter. The mayor or their 
347 designee shall have the sole power to sign, seal, execute and deliver in behalf of the city, deeds 
348 and leases of land sold or leased by the city, and other deeds, agreements, contracts, leases, 
349 indentures and assurances on behalf of the city. 
350  (b) Supervision of City Agencies - The mayor shall exercise general supervision and 
351 direction over all city agencies, unless otherwise provided by law or by this charter. Each city 
352 agency shall furnish to the mayor any information or materials the mayor may request and as the 
353 needs of the office of mayor and the interest of the city may require. The mayor shall be 
354 responsible for the efficient and effective coordination of the activities of all city agencies and 
355 may call together for consultation, conference and 
356  discussion, at reasonable times, all persons serving the city. 
357  (c) Multiple Member Bodies - The mayor shall be, by virtue of the office, a member of 
358 every appointed multiple member body of the city. The mayor may attend any meeting of an 
359 appointed multiple member body of the city, including executive sessions, to participate in the 
360 discussions of that body, provided, however, that the mayor shall not have the right to vote on 
361 any matter before a multiple member body which they serve on solely by virtue of their office. 
362  SECTION 3-5: APPOINTMENTS BY THE MAYOR 
363  (a) Department Heads - The mayor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the city 
364 council under section 2-8(a), all department heads for whom no other method of appointment or 
365 selection is provided by this charter. Department heads serve at the discretion of the mayor 

19 of 50 366 subject to the limitations and requirements imposed by federal and state laws, rules or 
367 regulations. 
368  (b) City Attorney - The city attorney shall be appointed by the mayor, subject to 
369 confirmation by the city council under section 2-8(a). The city attorney shall be appointed to a 2-
370 year term. Whenever the mayor appoints or reappoints a city attorney the mayor shall submit the 
371 name of a person to serve as city attorney for confirmation under section 2-8(a), and the 
372 provisions of such 2-8 (a) shall apply to both an appointment and reappointment, provided 
373 however that a reappointment shall not be rejected except by negative vote of 8 members of the 
374 city council. If the mayor fails to submit the name of a person serving as the city attorney for 
375 confirmation of reappointment within 30 days of the expiration of the term, the city clerk shall 
376 place an item on the agenda for such reappointment at the next regular city council meeting. 
377  (c) Multiple Member Bodies - The mayor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the 
378 city council under section 2-8(b), all members of multiple member bodies for whom no other 
379 method of appointment or selection is provided by administrative order or General Laws. All 
380 members shall serve terms as defined by administrative order or General Laws. Upon the 
381 expiration of the term of any member of a multiple member body, a successor shall be appointed 
382 in a like manner. The mayor shall fill any vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term of any 
383 member of a multiple member body. 
384  (d) Police and Fire Employees - The mayor may appoint and promote, subject to 
385 confirmation by the city council, members and officers of the police department and fire 
386 department subject to requirements of the state’s Civil Service law. 

20 of 50 387  (e) City Employees - The method of appointment for all other city employees shall be as 
388 prescribed by administrative order. 
389  SECTION 3-6: APPOINTMENT OF CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER 
390  The mayor shall appoint a chief administrative officer to coordinate and direct the 
391 operations and functions of municipal government. The chief administrative officer shall be 
392 appointed by the mayor, subject to confirmation by the city council under section 2-8(a). The 
393 appointee shall be chosen on the basis of appropriate administrative and executive qualifications 
394 and shall have a combination of experience, training, or education to perform the duties of the 
395 office. Whenever the mayor appoints a chief administrative officer, the mayor shall submit the 
396 name of a person to serve as a chief administrative officer for confirmation under section 2-8(a). 
397  SECTION 3-7: TEMPORARY APPOINTMENTS TO CITY OFFICES 
398  Whenever a temporary or permanent vacancy occurs in a city office that is appointed 
399 under section 3-5(a) & (b), the mayor may designate a person to perform the duties of the office 
400 on a temporary basis for up to 180 days until the position can be filled as provided by law or by 
401 this charter. Persons serving as temporary officers under this section shall have only those 
402 powers that are indispensable and essential to the performance of the duties of the office during 
403 the period of temporary appointment and no others. 
404  (a) Filing of a Temporary Appointment - When the mayor designates a person under this 
405 section, the mayor shall file a certificate with the city clerk in substantially the following form: 
406  “I designate [name of person] to perform the duties of the office of [office in which 
407 vacancy exists] on a temporary basis until the office can be filled by [the regular procedure for 

21 of 50 408 filling the vacancy or when the incumbent shall return]. I certify that this person is qualified to 
409 perform the duties which will be required and that I make this designation solely in the interests 
410 of the City of Somerville.” 
411  (b) Extension of Temporary Appointments - If an extension of a temporary appointment 
412 is necessary, the mayor may seek extensions in 90-day increments, which shall be authorized by 
413 a majority vote of the city council. If an extension is not approved, the position shall be deemed 
414 vacant. 
415  SECTION 3-8: TEMPORARY APPOINTMENTS TO MULTIPLE MEMBER BODIES 
416  Whenever a temporary or permanent vacancy occurs on a multiple member body that is 
417 appointed under section 3-5(c), the mayor may designate a person to perform the duties of the 
418 office on a temporary basis for up to 150 days until the position can be filled as provided by law 
419 or by this charter. Whenever such vacancy occurs on a quasi-judicial body or regulatory body, 
420 the mayor shall submit a communication to the city council with the name of such designee. If an 
421 extension of a temporary appointment is necessary, the mayor may seek extensions in 60-day 
422 increments, which shall be authorized by a majority vote of the city council. If an extension is 
423 not approved, the position shall be deemed vacant, except on multiple member bodies where the 
424 vacancy would prevent a quorum. In that instance, a temporary appointment shall be permitted to 
425 remain until a successor is qualified.  
426  SECTION 3-9: APPROVAL OF MAYOR, VETO 
427  Every ordinance or other measure as required by law adopted or passed by the city 
428 council, except any matters relating to the internal affairs of the city council, shall be presented 
429 to the mayor for approval. If the mayor approves the measure, the mayor shall sign it. If the 

22 of 50 430 mayor disapproves the measure, the mayor shall return it to the city council with the specific 
431 reason for disapproval attached in writing. The city council shall enter the objections of the 
432 mayor on its records and reconsider the measure at its subsequent regular meeting. If the city 
433 council, regardless of the disapproval by the mayor, shall again pass the identical measure by 
434 affirmative vote of 8 members of the city council, it shall then be deemed in force. If the mayor 
435 has neither signed a measure nor returned it to the city council within 10 days following the date 
436 it was presented to the mayor, the measure shall be deemed approved and in force. 
437  SECTION 3-10: COMMUNICATIONS; SPECIAL MEETINGS 
438  (a) Communications to the City Council - The mayor shall, by written communication:  
439  (1) recommend to the city council for its consideration measures as the needs of the city 
440 require; and  
441  (2) keep the city council fully informed of the financial and administrative condition of 
442 the city and shall specifically indicate any fiscal, financial, or administrative issues facing the 
443 city. 
444  (b) Special Meetings of the City Council - The mayor may call a special meeting of the 
445 city council for any purpose. Unless the mayor designates an emergency, notice of the meeting 
446 shall be delivered to the city clerk at least 3 business days in advance of the time set and shall 
447 specify the date, time, location and the purpose for which the meeting is to be held. The city 
448 clerk shall post an agenda for such meeting at least 2 business days in advance of the time set. 
449  SECTION 3-11: TEMPORARY ABSENCE OF THE MAYOR 

23 of 50 450  (a) Acting Mayor - Whenever the mayor is unable to perform the duties of the office, the 
451 president of the city council shall be the acting mayor. In the event that the city council president 
452 is unable to serve as acting mayor under this section, the city council shall elect a councilor to 
453 serve as acting mayor by majority vote from among its membership. The city council, by the 
454 affirmative vote of 8 members, shall determine whether the mayor is unable to perform the duties 
455 of the office. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the vote shall be taken 
456 in public session by a roll call vote. 
457  (b) Powers of Acting Mayor - The acting mayor shall have only those powers of the 
458 mayor that are indispensable and essential to conduct the business of the city and on which 
459 action may not be delayed. The acting mayor shall have no authority to make a permanent 
460 appointment or removal from city service unless the absence of the mayor shall extend beyond 
461 60 days, nor shall the acting mayor approve or disapprove of any measure adopted by the city 
462 council unless the time within which the mayor must act would expire before the return of the 
463 mayor. The city council president or another councilor serving as acting mayor shall not vote as 
464 a member of the city council. 
465  SECTION 3-12: DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY BY MAYOR 
466  The mayor may authorize and subsequently remove authorization from a subordinate 
467 officer or employee of the city to exercise or perform a function or duty of the office of the 
468 mayor, provided, however, that all acts performed under any delegation of authority during the 
469 period of authorization shall be and remain the acts of the mayor. Nothing in this section shall be 
470 construed to authorize the mayor to delegate the powers and duties of the mayor as a school 

24 of 50 471 committee member, the power of appointment to city office or employment, or the authority to 
472 sign or return measures approved by the city council unless the provisions of section 3-11 apply. 
473  SECTION 3-13: FILLING OF PERMANENT VACANCY 
474  Whenever a permanent vacancy occurs in the office of mayor, the process for filling of 
475 the vacancy shall be as follows:  
476  (a) If a vacancy occurs within the 6 months preceding a regular municipal election the 
477 office shall be filled by vote at that election. Otherwise, the city council shall call a special 
478 election to be held within 90 days following the date of the vacancy. The person elected as 
479 mayor shall take office immediately upon certification of the vote and serve for the balance of 
480 the remaining term. 
481  (b) The city council president shall serve as acting mayor until the vacancy is filled. If the 
482 city council president is unwilling or unable to serve, the city council shall elect a councilor to 
483 serve as the acting mayor by majority vote from among its membership. If the councilor serving 
484 as the acting mayor chooses to run for mayor, they shall not be entitled to have the words 
485 “candidate for reelection” printed with their name on the election ballot. Any person serving as 
486 acting mayor shall receive the compensation then in effect for the position of mayor and shall not 
487 vote as a member of the city council. The resulting vacancy on the city council shall be filled in 
488 the manner provided in section 2-12. 
489  ARTICLE 4 
490  SCHOOL COMMITTEE 
491  SECTION 4-1: COMPOSITION; TERM OF OFFICE; ELIGIBILITY 

25 of 50 492  (a) Composition - There shall be a school committee consisting of 9 members. Seven 
493 members shall be nominated and elected by the municipal voters of the city, 1 member elected 
494 from each ward. The mayor and the president of the city council shall serve, by virtue of their 
495 office, with the same powers and duties as other school committee members, provided, however, 
496 that neither shall serve as chair. 
497  (b) Term of Office - The term for the school committee shall be 2 years, beginning on the 
498 first business day in January following the municipal election. 
499  (c) Eligibility - Any statewide voter residing in the ward from which election is sought 
500 shall be eligible to hold the office of school committee member. If a school committee member 
501 removes from the city during the committee member’s term, that office shall immediately be 
502 deemed vacant and filled in the manner provided in section 4-6. If a school committee member 
503 removes to another ward in the city, the member may continue to serve for the balance of the 
504 term to which elected. 
505  SECTION 4-2: PROHIBITIONS 
506  A member of the school committee elected by ward shall not hold any other compensated 
507 city position. A former member of the school committee elected by ward shall not hold any 
508 compensated appointed city office or city employment for 1 year after termination of their 
509 service on the school committee. This section shall not prevent a city officer or other city 
510 employee who has vacated a position in order to serve as a member of the school committee 
511 elected by ward from returning to the same office or other position of city employment held at 
512 the time the position was vacated. 
513  SECTION 4-3: COMPENSATION 

26 of 50 514  Members of the school committee shall receive compensation for their services as set by 
515 ordinance by the city council. An ordinance authorizing the compensation of the members of the 
516 school committee shall not be effective unless: 
517  (1) it is adopted by affirmative vote of 8 members of the city council; 
518  (2) it is adopted prior to the last 6 months of the school committee’s term; and 
519  (3) it provides that the compensation is to take effect upon the organization of the city 
520 government following the next regular municipal election. 
521  SECTION 4-4: SCHOOL COMMITTEE RULES AND PROCEDURES 
522  The school committee shall determine the procedures for the election of school 
523 committee officers and adopt policies and procedures relating to conducting the business of the 
524 school committee. 
525  SECTION 4-5: SCHOOL COMMITTEE POWERS AND DUTIES 
526  The school committee shall have all powers which are conferred on school committees 
527 by the General Laws and the additional powers and duties provided by this charter, including but 
528 not limited to: 
529  (1) selecting and removing a superintendent of the schools who shall be charged with the 
530 administration of the school system, and appointment of all other personnel as provided by the 
531 General Laws; 
532  (2) adopting policies for the management of the public school system. as deemed 
533 necessary or desirable; 

27 of 50 534  (3) adopting and overseeing the administration of an annual operating budget for the 
535 school department, subject to appropriation; 
536  (4) providing ordinary maintenance of all school buildings and grounds, unless a central 
537 municipal maintenance department, which may include maintenance of school buildings and 
538 grounds, is established; and 
539  (5) at least 1 member of the school committee, or a designee of the school committee, 
540 shall serve on the agency, board, or committee for the planning or construction of a new, 
541 remodeled, or renovated school building. 
542  SECTION 4-6: FILLING OF VACANCIES 
543  If a vacancy on the school committee occurs with 1 year or more remaining in the term, 
544 the city council shall order a special election to fill the vacancy. If a vacancy on the school 
545 committee occurs with less than 1 year before the end of the term but more than 120 days before 
546 any regular municipal election, the school committee shall appoint a replacement to serve for the 
547 remainder of the term from the qualified statewide voters of the ward. The school committee 
548 shall post notice of the vacancy and solicitation of nominations and appoint the replacement in 
549 accordance with school committee policy. If a vacancy occurs within 120 days of a regular 
550 municipal election, the vacancy shall be filled by the regular election and the newly elected 
551 school committee member’s term shall begin following the certification of election results. The 
552 person elected shall be sworn to the office to fill the vacancy for the balance of the unexpired 
553 term as well as the term to which elected. The city clerk shall administer the oath of office to 
554 them at or before the next meeting of the school committee. 
555  ARTICLE 5 

28 of 50 556  ADMINISTRATIVE ORGANIZATION 
557  SECTION 5-1: ORGANIZATION OF CITY AGENCIES 
558  The organization of the city into agencies to provide services and administer the 
559 government may be accomplished only through an administrative order submitted to the city 
560 council by the mayor. An administrative order may not originate with the city council. The 
561 mayor may, subject only to express prohibitions of General Laws or this charter, propose 
562 administrative orders to establish a new agency, reorganize, consolidate or abolish any agency, in 
563 whole or in part, as is deemed necessary to conduct the business of the city in an orderly, 
564 efficient or convenient manner. The mayor may also propose administrative orders to establish 
565 terms of office and prescribe the functions and administrative procedures to be followed by all 
566 agencies. 
567  These proposed administrative orders shall be accompanied by a message from the mayor 
568 which explains the expected benefits and advises the city council if an administrative order shall 
569 require amendments, insertions, revisions, repeal, or otherwise of existing ordinances. Whenever 
570 the mayor proposes an administrative order, the city council shall hold 1 or more public hearings 
571 on the proposal and post notice. 
572  An organization or reorganization plan shall become effective at the expiration of 60 days 
573 from filing, unless the city council has disapproved the plan by majority vote prior to that date; 
574 provided, however, that if no regular city council meeting is held within the subsequent 60 days 
575 of the first regular meeting after the filing of an organization or reorganization plan, the city 
576 council shall instead have 60 days from the second regular meeting. The city council may vote 
577 only to approve or to disapprove the plan and may not vote to amend or to alter it. 

29 of 50 578  SECTION 5-2: QUALIFICATIONS FOR APPOINTMENTS AND PROMOTIONS 
579  All appointments and promotions of city officers and other city employees shall be made 
580 on the basis of fitness demonstrated by examination, past performance, or by other evidence of 
581 competence and suitability. Each person appointed to fill an office or position shall be a person 
582 who has the experience, training, or education to perform the duties of the office or position. 
583  ARTICLE 6 
584  FINANCIAL PROCEDURES 
585  SECTION 6-1: FISCAL YEAR 
586  The fiscal year of the city shall begin on July 1 and end on June 30, unless another period 
587 is required by the General Laws. 
588  SECTION 6-2: COMMUNITY AND COUNCIL BUDGET INPUT 
589  The city council shall hold a community budget hearing on or before February 15 of each 
590 year to solicit public input regarding budget priorities. The city council shall post notice of the 
591 community budget hearing 14 days in advance of the hearing. The mayor shall, at the first 
592 regular meeting of the city council of each year, solicit budget priorities from all city councilors. 
593  SECTION 6-3: ANNUAL BUDGET MEETING 
594  On or before March 1 of each year, the mayor shall call a joint meeting of the city council 
595 and school committee, including the superintendent of schools, to review the financial condition 
596 of the city, revenue and expenditure forecasts for at least 3 years and other relevant information 
597 prepared by the mayor in order to develop a coordinated budget. 

30 of 50 598  SECTION 6-4: SUBMISSION OF OPERATING BUDGET; BUDGET MESSAGE 
599  On or about May 30, the mayor shall submit to the city council a proposed operating 
600 budget for all city agencies for the next fiscal year. The proposed operating budget shall include 
601 the school budget, as adopted by the school committee, which shall be submitted to the mayor on 
602 or about May 15. The proposed operating budget shall be accompanied by a budget message and 
603 supporting documents. The budget message shall explain the operating budget in fiscal terms and 
604 in terms of work programs for all city agencies. It shall outline the proposed fiscal policies of the 
605 city for the next fiscal year, describe important features of the proposed operating budget and 
606 include any major variations from the current operating budget, fiscal policies, revenues and 
607 expenditures together with reasons for these changes. The proposed operating budget shall 
608 provide a complete fiscal plan of all city funds and activities and shall be in the form the mayor 
609 deems desirable, provided, however, that the budget proposals relative to elected officials shall 
610 identify the cost of compensation and the cost of benefits for such officials. The mayor and the 
611 superintendent of schools shall coordinate the dates and times of the school committee's budget 
612 process under the General Laws. 
613  SECTION 6-5: ACTION ON THE OPERATING BUDGET 
614  (a) Public Hearing - The city council shall post a notice of the proposed operating budget 
615 as submitted by the mayor. The notice shall state: (1) the times and places where copies of the 
616 entire proposed operating budget are available for inspection by the public; and (2) the date, time 
617 and place when a public hearing on the proposed operating budget shall be held by the city 
618 council, at least 7 days after posting of the notice. The city council shall not act on the budget 
619 until after the public hearing has occurred. 

31 of 50 620  (b) Adoption of the Budget - The city council shall take action on the proposed operating 
621 budget, which may have amendments, before the end of the fiscal year. In amending the 
622 proposed operating budget, the city council may delete or decrease amounts except expenditures 
623 required by law, provided, however, that the city council shall not increase any specific item or 
624 the total of the proposed operating budget except on the recommendation of the mayor or unless 
625 otherwise authorized by the General Laws. If the city council fails to act on an item in the 
626 proposed operating budget prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, that amount shall, without 
627 any action by the city council, become a part of the appropriations for the year and be available 
628 for the purposes specified. 
629  (c) Availability of the Operating Budget - In addition to any other posting requirements, 
630 immediately after the submission of the proposed budget to the city council, the mayor or their 
631 designee shall post the entire budget document on the city website, where it shall remain posted 
632 during the city council review process contained in this article. After the enactment of the budget 
633 the mayor or their designee shall post the final budget on the city website where it shall remain 
634 throughout the fiscal year for which it is in effect. The final budget shall reflect any amendments 
635 made by the city council and approved by the mayor and shall indicate that it is the final budget. 
636  SECTION 6-6: CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM 
637  (a) Submission - The mayor shall submit a capital improvement program to the city 
638 council on or about November 1 of each year. The mayor shall annually revise the information 
639 regarding the capital improvements still pending or in the process of being acquired, improved, 
640 or constructed. 
641  The capital improvement program shall include: 

32 of 50 642  (1) a general summary of its contents; 
643  (2) a list of all capital improvements proposed to be undertaken during the next 5 years, 
644 with supporting information as to the need for each capital improvement; 
645  (3) cost estimates, methods of financing, and recommended time schedules for each 
646 improvement; and 
647  (4) the estimated annual cost of operating and maintaining each           facility and piece 
648 of major equipment involved. 
649  (b) Public Hearing - The city council shall post a notice stating:  
650  (1) the times and places where entire copies of the capital improvements program are 
651 available for the public; and  
652  (2) the date, time, and place of a public hearing on the plan to be held by the city council 
653 between 14 and 21 days after posting of the notice. 
654  (c) Adoption - Following the public hearing, but not later than December 1, the city 
655 council shall by resolution adopt or reject the capital improvements program. The mayor may 
656 amend the adopted program, provided that each amendment shall be voted on separately, and 
657 that an increase in the capital improvements program as submitted shall clearly identify the 
658 method of financing to accomplish the proposed increase. 
659  SECTION 6-7: INDEPENDENT AUDIT 
660  The mayor shall annually provide for an outside audit of the books and accounts of the 
661 city in the form of an Annual Comprehensive Financial Report to be conducted by a certified 

33 of 50 662 public accountant or a firm of certified public accountants, which has no personal interest, direct 
663 or indirect, in the fiscal affairs of the city or any of its officers. The scope of the audit shall 
664 specify that each year of the audit engagement, a different department, division or program shall 
665 be subject to an expanded scope audit or internal control review. The city council may, by 
666 majority vote, determine the department, division or program to be subject to an expanded scope 
667 audit or internal control review. The award of a contract to audit shall be made by the mayor on 
668 or before September 15 of each year. The report of the audit and all accompanying documents, 
669 including a management letter so-called shall be filed in final form with the city council no later 
670 than March 1 in the year following its award. The certified public accountant or firm of certified 
671 public accountants shall make a presentation to the city council as soon as practicable after said 
672 March 1 but no later than May 31 of each year. At least every 3 years, the mayor shall conduct a 
673 procurement process using sound business practices to retain these services. 
674  SECTION 6-8: EXPENDITURES IN EXCESS OF APPROPRIATIONS 
675  Except as otherwise provided by law, an official of the city shall not knowingly or 
676 intentionally expend in a fiscal year sums in excess of the appropriations, awards, grants or gifts 
677 duly made in accordance with law or involve the city in any contract for the future payment of 
678 money in excess of these appropriations, awards, grants or gifts. It is the intention of this section 
679 that section 31 of chapter 44 of the General Laws shall be strictly enforced. Any official who 
680 violates this section shall be personally liable to the city for any amounts so expended to the 
681 extent that the city does not recover these amounts from the person to whom the sums were paid. 
682  ARTICLE 7 
683  ELECTIONS 

34 of 50 684  SECTION 7-1: PRELIMINARY ELECTIONS 
685  A preliminary election to nominate candidates for mayor, councilors at-large, ward 
686 councilors, and school committee members shall be held on the third Tuesday in September in 
687 each odd-numbered year in which the candidates are to be elected. The city clerk may, with the 
688 approval of the city council, reschedule the preliminary election to the fourth Tuesday in 
689 September to avoid a conflict with any civil or religious holiday. Whenever a special election to 
690 fill a vacancy is to be held, a preliminary election shall be conducted, if necessary, not less than 
691 28 days before the date established for the special election. A preliminary election to fill a 
692 vacancy in the office of ward councilor or school committee member shall be held only in the 
693 ward where there is a vacancy.  
694  SECTION 7-2: PRELIMINARY ELECTION PROCEDURES 
695  (a) Signature Requirements - The number of signatures of municipal voters required to 
696 place the name of a candidate on the official ballot to be used at a preliminary election shall be as 
697 follows: 
698  (1) Mayor - at least 250 certified signatures; 
699  (2) At-Large City Councilor - at least 100 certified signatures; 
700  (3) Ward City Councilor - at least 50 certified signatures, all of which shall be certified as 
701 being from the ward from which election is sought; and 
702  (4) School Committee Member - at least 50 certified signatures, all of which shall be 
703 certified as being from the ward from which election is sought. 

35 of 50 704  (b) Forms - Signatures of municipal voters shall be made on a form prescribed by the 
705 board of election commissioners and shall be made available not earlier than April 2 in each 
706 municipal election year. The forms shall be submitted to the board of election commissioners for 
707 certification of the names on or before the fourteenth day preceding the date fixed for submission 
708 to the city clerk. The forms shall be submitted to the city clerk on or before 5:00 p.m. on the 
709 forty-fifth day prior to the declared date of the preliminary election. An individual may appear on 
710 the ballot for only 1 office at any preliminary, regular or special municipal election. 
711  (c) Ballot Position - The order in which names of candidates for each office appear on the 
712 ballot shall be determined by a drawing conducted by the city clerk at least 40 days before the 
713 preliminary election. The drawing shall be open to the public. 
714  (d) Determination of Candidates:  
715  (1) Offices of Mayor, Ward Councilor, and School Committee - the 2 candidates who 
716 receive the highest number of votes for nomination to each office at the preliminary election 
717 shall, except as provided by paragraph 7-3(d)(3), be the candidates for that office. The 
718 candidates’ names shall be printed on the official ballot to be used at the regular or special 
719 municipal election at which the office is to be voted upon and an acceptance of a nomination 
720 shall not be necessary to its validity. 
721  (2) Offices of City Councilor At-Large - the 8 people who receive the highest number of 
722 votes for nomination to the office shall, except as provided by section 7-3(e), be the candidates 
723 for the office. The candidates’ names shall be printed on the official ballot to be used at the 
724 regular or special municipal election at which the office is to be voted upon and an acceptance of 
725 a nomination shall not be necessary to its validity. 

36 of 50 726  (3) Preliminary Results; Tied Vote - If there is a tie among candidates for the last 
727 available ballot position for any given elected office, then all candidates receiving the same 
728 number of votes for the office shall be printed on the regular municipal election ballot, 
729 notwithstanding any other provisions in this charter specifying the number of candidates to be 
730 printed on the election ballot. 
731  (e) Condition Making Preliminary Unnecessary - If the time for filing statements of 
732 candidates to be on the ballot for any preliminary election has expired, and the number of 
733 statements filed with the city clerk for an office is not more than 2 for the office of mayor, any 
734 ward councilor or school committee member, and 8 for the office of city councilor at-large, the 
735 candidates whose statements have been filed shall be deemed nominated to that office. Those 
736 candidates shall be voted on for the office at the regular or special municipal election. The city 
737 clerk shall not print those names on the ballot to be used at the preliminary election and another 
738 nomination to the office shall not be made, and a preliminary election shall not be held for the 
739 office or offices. 
740  SECTION 7-3: REGULAR MUNICIPAL ELECTION  
741  The regular municipal election shall be held on the Tuesday following the first Monday 
742 in November in each odd-numbered year. 
743  SECTION 7-4: BALLOT POSITION, REGULAR MUNICIPAL ELECTION  
744  The order in which names of candidates for each office appear on the ballot shall be 
745 determined by a drawing conducted by the city clerk not later than 7 days after the certification 
746 of the preliminary election results. If there is no preliminary election in advance of the regular 

37 of 50 747 municipal election or a special election, the drawing shall be conducted on the Tuesday 6 weeks 
748 prior to the election. The drawing shall be open to the public. 
749  SECTION 7-5: NON-PARTISAN ELECTIONS 
750  All elections for city offices shall be non-partisan and election ballots shall be printed 
751 without any party mark, emblem or other political designation. 
752  SECTION 7-6: WARDS 
753  The territory of the city shall be divided into 7 wards by the city clerk to consist of as 
754 nearly an equal number of inhabitants as it is possible to achieve, based on compact and 
755 contiguous territory, bounded as far as possible by the center line of known streets or ways or by 
756 other well-defined limits. Each ward shall be composed of voting precincts established under the 
757 General Laws. The city council shall review these wards to ensure uniformity in the number of 
758 inhabitants at least once every 10 years. 
759  SECTION 7-7: APPLICATION OF STATE GENERAL LAWS 
760  Except as otherwise expressly provided in this charter and authorized by law, all 
761 municipal elections shall be governed by the General Laws relating to the right to vote, the 
762 registration of voters, the nomination of candidates, voting places, the conduct of preliminary, 
763 regular and special  municipal election, the submission of charters, charter amendments and 
764 other propositions to the voters, the counting of votes, the recounting of votes, and the 
765 determination of results. 
766  ARTICLE 8 
767  GENERAL PROVISIONS 

38 of 50 768  SECTION 8-1: CHARTER CHANGES 
769  This charter may be replaced, revised or amended in accordance with the state 
770 constitution or the General Laws. 
771  SECTION 8-2: SPECIFIC PROVISION TO PREVAIL 
772  To the extent that a specific provision of this charter conflicts with any provision 
773 expressed in general terms, the specific provision of this charter shall prevail. 
774  SECTION 8-3: RULES AND REGULATIONS 
775  A copy of all rules and regulations adopted by a city agency shall be posted to the city 
776 website. Unless an emergency exists, as determined by the mayor, a rule or regulation adopted 
777 by a city agency shall not become effective until at least 5 days following the date it is posted. 
778 This section shall not apply to internal operating protocols and policies enacted by city 
779 departments. 
780  SECTION 8-4: PERIODIC REVIEW OF CHARTER 
781  The mayor and city council shall provide for a review to be made of the city charter at 
782 least once every 10 years to determine the need, if any, for changes and prepare 
783 recommendations addressing any proposed changes. The manner of the review shall be 
784 established by ordinance and incorporate opportunities for community input. The report of the 
785 committee and accompanying recommendations, if any, shall be filed with the city clerk on a 
786 date specified by ordinance. 
787  SECTION 8-5: PERIODIC REVIEW OF ORDINANCES 

39 of 50 788  The mayor and city council shall provide for a review to be made of some or all of the 
789 city ordinances at least once every 10 years to determine the need for amendments, if any. Such 
790 review shall be scheduled to follow the charter review as provided in section 8-4 of the charter 
791 by at least 1 year. The manner of the review shall be established by ordinance. The review of city 
792 ordinances shall be under the supervision of the city attorney and incorporate opportunities for 
793 community input. The recommendations shall be filed with the city clerk on a date specified by 
794 ordinance. 
795  SECTION 8-6: PERIODIC REVIEW OF MULTIPLE MEMBER BODIES 
796  The mayor and the city council shall provide for a review to be made of all multiple 
797 member bodies at least once every 10 years, provided, however, that such bodies as are required 
798 in cities by the General Laws shall not be included in such review. This review shall be made by 
799 a special committee whose membership and term shall be determined by ordinance, and the 
800 initial review shall be implemented as provided in section 9-7(d). The special committee shall 
801 file its report with the city clerk on a date specified by ordinance. The committee’s report should 
802 include an assessment of the function and relevance of multiple member bodies included in the 
803 review, and may include recommendations to combine, dissolve or create multiple member 
804 bodies to address redundancies or emerging concerns of the city.  
805  SECTION 8-7: UNIFORM PROCEDURES GOVERNING MULTIPLE MEMBER 
806 BODIES 
807  Open meeting law and procedures in the General Laws shall apply to the proceedings of 
808 multiple member bodies, and shall include the following: 

40 of 50 809  (1) Officers - All appointed multiple member bodies shall elect a chair, a vice-chair and 
810 any other officer it deems necessary. 
811  (2) Meetings - All appointed multiple member bodies of the city shall meet regularly at 
812 the times and places that the multiple member body, by the body’s own rules, prescribe. Special 
813 meetings of any multiple member body shall be held at the call of the chair or by a majority of 
814 the members of the body. Notice of the meeting shall be posted as required by law. Except as 
815 may otherwise be authorized by law, all meetings of all multiple member bodies shall, at all 
816 times, be open to the public. 
817  (3) Meeting Documents and Submissions - Each appointed multiple member body shall 
818 determine its own rules and order of business. Each multiple member body shall provide for the 
819 keeping of agendas, minutes and related submissions of its proceedings. All documents shall be a 
820 public record and certified copies shall be placed on file in the office of the city clerk within a 
821 reasonable period from the date of approval. 
822  (4) Voting - If requested by any member, a vote of an appointed multiple member body 
823 shall be taken by a roll call vote and the vote of each member shall be recorded in the minutes, 
824 provided, however, that if the vote is unanimous only that fact need be recorded. Unless some 
825 other provision is made by the multiple member body's own rules while a quorum is present, 
826 except on procedural matters, any action on a matter representing an exercise of the powers of 
827 the multiple member body shall require a majority vote. General Laws related to a vote to meet 
828 in executive session shall always require a majority of members of the body. 
829  SECTION 8-8: REFERENCES TO GENERAL LAWS 

41 of 50 830  All references to General Laws contained in this charter refer to the Massachusetts 
831 General Laws and are intended to refer to and to include any amendments or revisions to 
832 chapters or sections or to the corresponding chapters and sections of any rearrangement, revision 
833 or recodification of statutes enacted or adopted subsequent to the adoption of this charter. 
834  SECTION 8-9: COMPUTATION OF TIME 
835  In computing time under this charter, the day of the act or event after which the 
836 designated time period begins to run shall not be included. The last day of the period shall be 
837 included, unless it is a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, in which event the period shall be 
838 extended to the next business day. 
839  SECTION 8-10: OATHS OR AFFIRMATIONS 
840  (a) Officials Elected in Regular Municipal Elections - On the first business day in January 
841 of each even-numbered year, the city council members-elect, the school committee members-
842 elect and the mayor-elect, shall meet and take an oath or affirmation to faithfully discharge the 
843 duties of their office. The oath or affirmation shall be administered by the city clerk, the assistant 
844 city clerk, a judge of a court of record or by a justice of the peace. Each official taking the oath 
845 or affirmation shall also sign a written version, which shall be kept in a bound book maintained 
846 by the city clerk. If the mayor-elect or any member-elect of the city council or school committee 
847 is absent on the day the oath is administered, the oath or affirmation shall be administered at any 
848 time within 10 days of the first business day of January, unless circumstances beyond the control 
849 of the officer-elect prevent such action, but in no instance shall the time period to be sworn to 
850 office extend beyond 30 days from the first business day of January.  

42 of 50 851  (b) Other Elected Officials and Appointed Positions - Except as otherwise provided by 
852 law, every person who is elected or appointed to an office or as a member of a multiple member 
853 body shall take an oath or affirmation before performing any act under this election or 
854 appointment. A record of this oath or affirmation shall be kept by the city clerk. 
855  SECTION 8-11: LIMITATION ON OFFICE HOLDING 
856  Unless otherwise allowed by law or this charter, a person shall not simultaneously hold 
857 more than 1 office or position of employment with the city. This section may be waived by the 
858 mayor by filing a notice of the waiver with an explanation and justification with the city clerk. 
859  SECTION 8-12: FELONY CONVICTION 
860  An elected official who has been convicted of a state or federal felony while holding 
861 office shall be deemed to have vacated the office. 
862  SECTION 8-13: ENFORCEMENT OF CHARTER PROVISIONS 
863  It shall be the duty of the mayor to see that this charter is faithfully followed and 
864 complied with by all city agencies and employees. Whenever it appears to the mayor that a city 
865 agency or employee is not following this charter, the mayor shall, in writing, cause notice to be 
866 given to that agency or employee directing compliance with this charter. Whenever it appears to 
867 the city council that the mayor is not following this charter, the city council shall, by resolution, 
868 direct the attention of the mayor to those areas in which it believes there is a failure to comply 
869 with this charter. The procedures made available in chapter 231A of the General Laws may be 
870 used to determine the rights, duties, or other legal relations arising under this charter, including 
871 any question of construction or validity which may be involved in that determination. 

43 of 50 872  ARTICLE 9 
873  TRANSITION PROVISIONS 
874  SECTION 9-1: CONTINUATION OF EXISTING LAWS 
875  (a) All General Laws, special laws, city ordinances, city council votes, rules and 
876 regulations of or pertaining to the city that are in force when this charter takes effect, and not 
877 specifically or by implication repealed by this charter, shall continue in full force and effect until 
878 amended or repealed, or rescinded by due course of law, or until they expire by their own 
879 limitation. In any case in which the provisions of this charter are found to be inconsistent with 
880 the provisions of any general or special law that would otherwise be applicable, the provisions of 
881 this charter shall prevail. 
882  (b) Except as otherwise provided in this charter, the city shall not be subject to provisions 
883 of chapter 31 of the General Laws. Uniform positions within the police department below the 
884 rank of deputy chief shall continue to be subject to said chapter 31. All uniform positions within 
885 the fire department, except the assistant chief position and the employee serving in such capacity, 
886 shall continue to be subject to said chapter 31. Tenured civil service employees of the city shall 
887 continue to be subject to the provisions of said chapter 31 in the classification held at the time of 
888 the effective date of this charter. 
889  SECTION 9-2: CONTINUATION OF GOVERNMENT AND ADMINISTRATION 
890  All city agencies and city officials shall continue to perform their duties until 
891 reappointed, until successors to their respective positions are appointed or until their duties have 
892 been transferred and assumed by another city agency. All officers and department heads 

44 of 50 893 previously appointed or appointed and confirmed at the time this charter takes effect shall not be 
894 required to be re-appointed or re-appointed and confirmed, unless otherwise provided by this 
895 charter.   
896  SECTION 9-3: TRANSFER OF RECORDS AND PROPERTY 
897  All records and property of any city agency, or part thereof, the powers and duties of 
898 which are assigned in whole or in part to another city agency, shall be transferred forthwith to 
899 that agency. 
900  SECTION 9-4: CONTINUATION OF PERSONNEL 
901  All city office holders and employees shall retain the office, position or 
902  employment they hold, and shall continue to perform the duties of the office, position or 
903 employment until their employment or position is otherwise terminated or other provisions are 
904 made. A person in full-time service of the city shall not forfeit accrued time in service of the city 
905 as a result of adoption of this charter. 
906  SECTION 9-5: EFFECT ON OBLIGATIONS, TAXES, ETC. 
907  All official bonds, recognizances, obligations, contracts and other instruments entered 
908 into or executed by, with, or on the behalf of the city before the adoption of this charter, shall 
909 continue to be obligations of the city; and all taxes, assessments, fines, penalties and forfeitures, 
910 incurred or imposed, due or owing to the city, shall be enforced and collected; and all writs, 
911 prosecutions, actions and causes of action, except as herein otherwise provided, shall continue 
912 without abatement and remain unaffected by this charter; and any legal act done by or in favor of 
913 the city shall not be rendered invalid by reason of the adoption of this charter. 

45 of 50 914  SECTION 9-6: DISPOSITION OF CERTAIN SPECIAL ACTS 
915  (a) Certain Special Acts repealed - The following special acts are hereby repealed: 
916 St.1899, c. 240, establishing a charter for the city of Somerville; provided, however, that section 
917 38 establishing the composition and term of the board of health, section 39 establishing the 
918 composition and term of the board of library trustees, and section 43 requiring that the 
919 purchasing agent make all city purchases, shall remain in effect until such time as the city acts 
920 under Article 5 of the charter to enact 1 or more administrative orders; St. 1982, c. 656 
921 authorizing the mayor and council salaries to be set by ordinance;  St. 1989, c. 355, establishing 
922 a 3 year term for the city clerk;, St. 2014, c. 90, filling a vacancy in the office of mayor;  St. 
923 2018, c. 355, replacing the words “board of aldermen” and “alderman”, with the words “city 
924 council”  and  “councilor”, replacing the words “alderman at-large” with the words “councilor 
925 at-large”, and replacing the words “aldermen-elect” with the words “council-elect”, and St. 2022, 
926 c. 312, making c. 240 of 1899 gender neutral. 
927  (b) Certain Special Acts Recognized and Retained - The following special acts, including 
928 those which amended Chapter 240 of the Acts of 1899, relating to the organization of the city's 
929 government, are recognized and retained as follows, notwithstanding any reference to said c. 
930 240: St. 1923, c.191, St. 1939, c.190,  and St. 2018, c.410 relating to the Licensing Commission; 
931 St. 1928, c. 41 and c. 81, St. 2021, c. 63 relating to the Board of Appeals; St. 1928, c. 82, St. 
932 2018, c. 410, and St. 2012, c. 400 relating to the Board of Election Commissioners; St. 1934, c. 
933 294 relating to the Auditor,  St. 1934, c. 295 relating to the Treasurer; St. 1953, c. 653, St. 1988, 
934 c. 94, ss. 40, 40A, B, C, and D, St. 2004, c. 317, and St. 2008, c.112 relating to the Department 
935 of Public Works; St. 1977, c. 644 relating to the School Committee; St. 1985, c. 23, and St. 2012, 
936 c. 400 relating to the Board of Assessors; St. 1991, c. 390 relating to the Disabilities 

46 of 50 937 Commission; St. 2008, c. 106 establishing the Municipal Hearing Officer; St. 2012, c. 381,  and 
938 St. 2016, c. 142  relating to the Alcoholic Beverages Commission; St. 2018, c. 364 relating to the 
939 Redevelopment Authority; St. 1978, c.297, St. 2012, c.312. and St. 2012, c. 400 relating to the 
940 Traffic Commission; and ss. 1-10, 26, 50, 43, 47, 48, 49, 50, 56, 57, 58, 59 and 60 of c. 400 of 
941 the Acts of 2012 until such time as the city acts under Article 5 of this charter to adopt 1 or more 
942 administrative orders. 
943  SECTION 9-7: TIME OF TAKING EFFECT 
944  (a) The provisions of section 3-6 of this charter relating to the appointment of the Chief 
945 Administrative Officer shall take effect following the regular municipal election in 2025.  
946  (b) The provisions of Article 7 relating to municipal elections shall be in effect for the 
947 preliminary and regular municipal elections to be held in 2027.  
948  (c) The provisions of Article 6 relating to the operating budget, the capital improvements 
949 program, and the municipal audit shall take effect for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026 (FY 
950 2027). 
951  (d) Within 180 days of the adoption of this charter, the mayor shall promulgate and 
952 submit an administrative order pursuant to Article 5 establishing a selection process for a city 
953 attorney. Any such selection process shall include the establishment of a special screening 
954 committee to review candidates for the position of city attorney. Said special screening 
955 committee shall include at least 1 member of the city council, designated by the city council 
956 president. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to apply to the reappointment of a city 
957 attorney.  

47 of 50 958  (e) Creation of Public Financing of Campaigns Committee - Within 6 months of the 
959 adoption of this charter, the city council shall create a public financing of campaigns committee 
960 to study public financing mechanisms and prepare recommendations with the goal of making 
961 running for office in the city more accessible to potential candidates. The directive of this study 
962 committee is to consider a full range of options as practicable, provide analysis on the potential 
963 benefits and barriers of each option, and consider which should be recommended to the city 
964 council for its consideration. 
965  The committee shall consist of 9 members: 1 shall be the chair of the board of elections 
966 commissioners or their designee, 1 shall be the city council president or their designee, 1 shall be 
967 the chair of the school committee or their designee, 2 shall be city residents appointed by the city 
968 council, 2 shall be city residents appointed by the school committee, 2 shall be city residents 
969 appointed by the mayor. The committee shall elect a chair and establish the schedule of its 
970 meetings. The committee shall issue recommendations to the city council within 12 months of 
971 the appointment of all of the members. The city council shall take action on the 
972 recommendations within 90 days of receipt. If the city council has already taken action 
973 consistent with this provision, no action is necessary. 
974  (f) Creation of Ranked Choice Voting Implementation Committee - Within 6 months of 
975 the adoption of this charter, the city council shall create a ranked choice voting committee to 
976 propose a measure to adopt ranked-choice voting and submit a report on ranked-choice voting in 
977 the city. A voting method shall be considered ranked choice voting if the municipal voter ranks 
978 candidates in order of preference. The committee’s report shall include:  
979  (1) the elected offices to be selected by this voting method;  

48 of 50 980  (2) a timeframe and strategy for implementation;  
981  (3) infrastructure and equipment requirements;  
982  (4) a cost analysis;  
983  (5) a comparative analysis of other voting methods;  
984  (6) an analysis of potential equity concerns; and  
985  (7) a community education plan.  
986  If the city council has already taken action consistent with this provision, no action is 
987 necessary. The goal of this committee is to implement ranked choice voting in order to more 
988 accurately reflect the will of the voters, increase the number and diversity of candidates, lower 
989 barriers to candidate participation and increase transparency of elections. 
990  The committee shall consist of 9 members: 1 shall be the chair of the board of elections 
991 commissioners or their designee, 1 shall be the city council president or their designee, 1 shall be 
992 the chair of the school committee or their designee, 2 shall be city residents appointed by the city 
993 council, 2 shall be city residents appointed by the school committee, 2 shall be city residents 
994 appointed by the mayor. The committee shall elect a Chair and establish the schedule of its 
995 meetings. The committee shall propose a measure to the city council within 18 months of the 
996 appointment of its full membership. The city council shall take action on the measure within 90 
997 days of receipt. 
998  (g) Initial Periodic Review of Multiple Member Bodies - The mayor and the city council 
999 shall convene the first periodic review of multiple member bodies committee, pursuant to section 
1000 8-6, within 6 months of the adoption of this charter. The committee’s report should include:  

49 of 50 1001  (1) an assessment of the functions and relevancies of the city’s current multiple member 
1002 bodies;  
1003  (2) a review of activities of multiple member bodies from recent years;  
1004  (3) the ability of the city to fill appointments to the body; and  
1005  (4) recommendations for combining, terminating, or establishing new multiple member 
1006 bodies.  
1007  If the city council has already taken action consistent with this provision, no action is 
1008 necessary.  
1009  The committee shall consist of 5 members: 1 shall be the mayor or their designee, 1 shall 
1010 be the city council president or their designee, 1 shall be the city clerk, 1 shall be a city resident 
1011 appointed by the mayor, 1 shall be a city resident appointed by the city council. 
1012  The committee shall submit a report to the city council. The city council shall respond to 
1013 and vote on the recommendations within 90 days of receipt. 
1014  (h) The city council shall consider the acceptance of section 91 of chapter 41 of the 
1015 General laws within 120 days of the adoptions of this charter. 
1016  SECTION 2. The city clerk shall cause the following question to be placed on the official 
1017 ballot to be used in the city of Somerville at the next regular municipal election to be held on 
1018 November 4, 2025 or the next regular municipal election at which the city can comply with the 
1019 applicable Commonwealth ballot requirements: Shall the city adopt Chapter XXX of the Acts of 
1020 2025 that provides a special act charter for the city of Somerville? The city attorney shall prepare 
1021 the summary of the proposed special act charter which shall appear on the ballot along with the 

50 of 50 1022 question provided in this section and the city attorney shall submit the question and summary to 
1023 the city clerk in accordance with section 42C of chapter 54 of the General Laws. 
1024  SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect upon acceptance by a majority of the voters of 
1025 the city voting in the affirmative, but not otherwise. 
1026  SECTION 4. Section 2 shall take effect upon passage. 
1027  SECTION 5. The city clerk shall cause the following question to be placed on the official 
1028 ballot to be used in the city of Somerville at the next regular municipal election to be held on 
1029 November 4, 2025 or the next regular municipal election at which the city can comply with the 
1030 applicable Commonwealth ballot requirements: Shall the term of office for the mayor of the city 
1031 of Somerville be for 4 years? 
1032  SECTION 6. Section 5 shall take effect upon acceptance by the majority of the voters of 
1033 the city voting in the affirmative and the term of office of the mayor shall be for 4 years for the 
1034 term commencing in January 2028, but not otherwise. If the majority of the voters of the city 
1035 vote in the affirmative, the charter shall be amended in the sections relating to or referencing the 
1036 term of the office of mayor.